Washington statutes.
RCW 12.28.005

Chapter 7.64 RCW available to plaintiff in action to recover possession of personal property.

The plaintiff in an action to recover the possession of personal property may claim and obtain the immediate delivery of the property, after a hearing, as provided in chapter 7.64 RCW.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 132 s 8.]